District of Columbia statutes.
1-739

Criminal penalties.

Whoever willfully violates any provision of this subchapter (other than §§ 1-735 and 1-738), or any regulation or order issued under any such provision, shall be fined not more than $5,000, or imprisoned not more than 1 year, or both, except that in the case of such a violation by a person not an individual, such person shall be fined not more than $100,000.

History

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 169

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-739.
1973 Ed., § 1-1839.